Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 6. Construction of Powers.

Sec. 29.35.400.
General construction.

A liberal construction shall be given to all powers and functions of a municipality conferred in this title.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.35.410.
Extent of powers.

Unless otherwise limited by law, a municipality has and may exercise all powers and functions necessarily or fairly implied in or incident to the purpose of all powers and functions conferred in this title.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.35.420.
Enumeration of powers.

A specific example in an enumerated power or function conferred upon a municipality in this title is illustrative of the object and not a limitation on or exclusion from the exercise of the power or function.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2008, “A specific example” was substituted for “Specific examples” to correct a manifest grammatical error.